North Dakota statutes. CONSTITUTION OF NORTH DAKOTA
ARTICLE V EXECUTIVE BRANCH

Section 1. [Governor — Executive power]

The executive power is vested in the governor, who shall reside in the state capital and shall hold the office for the term of four years beginning in the year 2000, and until a successor is elected and qualified.

Section 2. [Election of state officials — Duties]

The qualified electors of the state at the times and places of choosing members of the legislative assembly shall choose a governor, lieutenant governor, agriculture commissioner, attorney general, auditor, insurance commissioner, three public service
commissioners, secretary of state, superintendent of public instruction, tax commissioner, and treasurer. The legislative assembly may by law provide for a department of labor to be administered by a public official who may be either
elected or appointed.

The powers and duties of the agriculture commissioner, attorney general, auditor, insurance commissioner, public service commissioners, secretary of state, superintendent of public instruction, tax commissioner, and treasurer must be prescribed by law.
If the legislative assembly establishes a labor department, the powers and duties of the officer administering that department must be prescribed by law.

Section 3. [Joint ballot for governor and lieutenant governor]

The governor and the lieutenant governor must be elected on a joint ballot. Each vote cast for a candidate for governor is deemed cast also for the candidate for lieutenant governor running jointly with the candidate for governor. The joint candidates
having the highest number of votes must be declared elected. If two or more joint candidates have an equal and highest number of votes for governor and lieutenant governor, the legislative assembly in joint session at its next regular
session shall choose one pair of joint candidates for the offices. The returns of the election for governor and lieutenant governor must be made in the manner prescribed by law.

Section 4. [Qualifications]

To be eligible to hold an elective office established by this article, a person must be a qualified elector of this state, must be at least twenty-five years of age on the day of the election, and must have been a resident of this state for the five years
preceding election to office. To be eligible to hold the office of governor or lieutenant governor, a person must be at least thirty years old on the day of the election. The attorney general must be licensed to practice law in this
state.

Section 5. [Terms of office]

The qualified electors shall choose the elected state officials at a time designated by the legislative assembly. The elected state officials shall serve until their successors are duly qualified. Terms of office of the elected officials except the public
service commissioners are four years, except that in 2004 the agriculture commissioner, attorney general, secretary of state, and tax commissioner are elected to a term of two years. The terms of the public service commissioners are
six years, so arranged that one of them is elected every two years. The terms of the governor and lieutenant governor begin on December fifteenth following their election.

If two or more candidates for any executive office other than for governor and lieutenant governor receive an equal and highest number of votes, the legislative assembly in joint session shall choose one of them for the office.

Section 6. [Offices to be held in state capital]

The elected state officials and the chief executive officers of the principal departments shall hold office in the state capital.

Section 7. [Powers and duties of governor]

The governor is the chief executive of the state. The governor shall have the responsibility to see that the state’s business is well administered and that its laws are faithfully executed.

The governor is commander-in-chief of the state’s military forces, except when they are called into the service of the United States, and the governor may mobilize them to execute the laws and maintain order.

The governor shall prescribe the duties of the lieutenant governor in addition to those prescribed in this article.

The governor may call special sessions of the legislative assembly.

The governor shall present information on the condition of the state, together with any recommended legislation, to every regular and special session of the legislative assembly.

The governor shall transact and supervise all necessary business of the state with the United States, the other states, and the officers and officials of this state.

The governor may grant reprieves, commutations, and pardons. The governor may delegate this power in a manner provided by law.

Section 8. [Power to fill vacancy]

The governor may fill a vacancy in any office by appointment if no other method is provided by this constitution or by law. If, while the senate is recessed or adjourned, a vacancy occurs in any office that is filled by appointment with senate confirmation,
the governor shall make a temporary appointment to the office. When the senate reconvenes the governor shall make a nomination to fill the office. Except on request of the senate, no nominee rejected by the senate may again be nominated
for that office at the same session, nor may the nominee be appointed to that office during a recess or adjournment of the senate.

Section 9. [When bill becomes law — Veto power — Line-item veto]

Every bill passed by the legislative assembly must be presented to the governor for the governor’s signature. If the governor signs the bill, it becomes law.

The governor may veto a bill passed by the legislative assembly. The governor may veto items in an appropriation bill. Portions of the bill not vetoed become law.

The governor shall return for reconsideration any vetoed item or bill, with a written statement of the governor’s objections, to the house in which it originated. That house shall immediately enter the governor’s objections upon its journal. If, by a
recorded vote, two-thirds of the members elected to that house pass a vetoed item or bill, it, along with the statement of the governor’s objections, must immediately be delivered to the other house. If, by a recorded vote, two-thirds
of the members elected to the other house also pass it, the vetoed item or bill becomes law.

While the legislative assembly is in session, a bill becomes law if the governor neither signs nor vetoes it within three legislative days after its delivery to the governor. If the legislative assembly is not in session, a bill becomes law if the governor
neither signs nor vetoes it within fifteen days, Saturdays and Sundays excepted, after its delivery to the governor.

Section 10. [Bribery]

A governor who asks, receives, or agrees to receive any bribe upon any understanding that the governor’s official opinion, judgment, or action shall be influenced thereby, or who gives or offers, or promises the governor’s official influence in consideration
that any member of the legislative assembly shall give the member’s official vote or influence on any particular side of any question or matter upon which the member may be required to act in the member’s official capacity, or who
menaces any member by the threatened use of the governor’s veto power, or who offers or promises any member that the governor will appoint any particular person or persons to any office created or thereafter to be created, in consideration
that any member shall give the member’s official vote or influence on any matter pending or thereafter to be introduced into either house of the legislative assembly, or who threatens any member that the governor will remove any person
or persons from office or position with intent in any manner to influence the action of that member, must be punished in the manner now, or that may hereafter be, provided by law, and upon conviction thereof forfeits all right to hold
or exercise any office of trust or honor in this state.

Section 11. [Lieutenant governor]

The lieutenant governor shall succeed to the office of governor when a vacancy occurs in the office of governor. If, during a vacancy in the office of governor, the lieutenant governor is unable to serve because of death, impeachment, resignation, failure
to qualify, removal from office, or disability, the secretary of state shall act as governor until the vacancy is filled or the disability removed.

Section 12. [Lieutenant governor — President of senate]

The lieutenant governor shall serve as president of the senate. If the senate is equally divided on a question, the lieutenant governor may vote on procedural matters and on substantive matters if the lieutenant governor’s vote would be decisive.